dicts/it_IT/it_IT.aff
PFX $ Y 62 # gestione dei numeri romani 2#2
PFX $ 0 x [cl]
PFX $ 0 l x
PFX $ 0 c [xlcdm]
PFX $ 0 cx [lc]
PFX $ 0 cl x
PFX $ 0 cc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 ccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 ccl x
PFX $ 0 ccc [xl]
PFX $ 0 cccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 cccl x
PFX $ 0 cd [xl]
PFX $ 0 cdx [lc]
PFX $ 0 cdl x
PFX $ 0 d [xlc]
PFX $ 0 dx [lc]
PFX $ 0 dl x
PFX $ 0 dc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 dcx [lc]
PFX $ 0 dcl x
PFX $ 0 dcc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 dccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 dccl x
PFX $ 0 dccc [xl]
PFX $ 0 dcccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 dcccl x
PFX $ 0 cm [xl]
PFX $ 0 cmx [lc]
PFX $ 0 cml x
PFX $ 0 m [xlcdm]
PFX $ 0 mx [lc]
PFX $ 0 ml x
PFX $ 0 mc [xlcmd]
PFX $ 0 mcx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcl x
PFX $ 0 mcc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mccl x
PFX $ 0 mccc [xl]
PFX $ 0 mcccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcccl x
PFX $ 0 mcd [xl]
PFX $ 0 mcdx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcdl x
PFX $ 0 md [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mdx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdl x
PFX $ 0 mdc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mdcx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdcl x
PFX $ 0 mdcc [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mdccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdccl x
PFX $ 0 mdccc [xl]
PFX $ 0 mdcccx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mdcccl x
PFX $ 0 mcm [xl]
PFX $ 0 mcmx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mcml x
PFX $ 0 mm [xlc]
PFX $ 0 mmx [lc]
PFX $ 0 mml x
